Utah statutes.
31A-17-407.   Accounting for repurchased shares.

When a corporation acquires its own shares under Section 31A-5-306 or in any other way, the acquired shares are accounted as a deduction from capital and not as assets.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

